FST/guessLexc.lexc
!!! Brand-New Lexicon For Kinyarwanda!!!

Multichar_Symbols
  !!!Class markers
	+CL1 +CL2 +CL3 +CL4 +CL5 +CL6 +CL7 +CL8 +CL9 CL1%0 +CL11 +CL12 +CL13 +CL14 +CL15 +CL16
	+NO.AUGMENT	!!!Augment (initial vowel of class prefix) has been dropped. (EG, 'mugabo' is 'umugabo' with the augment dropped)
	
	!!!! Person and number
	+1SG +1PL +2SG +2PL +3SG +3PL
	
	!!!!For possessive constructions, indicates the class of the possessee
	+OWNED.CL1 +OWNED.CL2 +OWNED.CL3 +OWNED.CL4 +OWNED.CL5 +OWNED.CL6 +OWNED.CL7 +OWNED.CL8 +OWNED.CL9 +OWNED.CL1%0 +OWNED.CL11 +OWNED.CL12 +OWNED.CL13 +OWNED.CL14 +OWNED.CL15 +OWNED.CL16
	
	!!!!For possessive constructions, indicates the class of the possessor
	+OWNER.CL1 +OWNER.CL2 +OWNER.CL3 +OWNER.CL4 +OWNER.CL5 +OWNER.CL6 +OWNER.CL7 +OWNER.CL8 +OWNER.CL9 +OWNER.CL1%0 +OWNER.CL11 +OWNER.CL12 +OWNER.CL13 +OWNER.CL14 +OWNER.CL15 +OWNER.CL16 		
	
	!!!!Part of speech
	+NUM		!!!!Numeral
	+PUNC		!!!Punctuation
	+INTERJ		!!!Interjection
	+PREP		!!!Preposition
	+ADJ		!!!Adjective
	+N		!!!Noun
	+PRO		!!!Pronoun
	+CONJ		!!!Conjunction
	+ADV		!!!Adverb
	+V		!!!Verb
	+DEM		!!!Demonstrative
	+PROPER		!!!!Proper noun
	+GUESS		!!!!Guess 
	
	!!!Miscellaneous morphemes
	+OF		!!!"of" marker (-nya)
	+THAT.OF	!!!"that of" marker (-ninye)
	+ALONE		!!!"alone" marker for pronouns
	+ALSO 		!!!"also" marker (-na)

	!!!Different forms of demonstratives
	+THAT.FAR		!!!That - far away
	+THAT.MENT		!!!That - previously mentioned
	+THIS.RIGHT		!!!This - right here
	+THAT.FAMILIAR		!!!That - familiar
	+THIS			!!!This
	+THAT.NEAR		!!!That - near
	

	+POSS		!!!Possessive
	
	!!!Verb components
		!!!Objects
		+OBJ.1SG +OBJ.1PL +OBJ.2SG +OBJ.2PL +OBJ.3SG +OBJ.3PL
		+OBJ.CL1 +OBJ.CL2 +OBJ.CL3 +OBJ.CL4 +OBJ.CL5 +OBJ.CL6 +OBJ.CL7 +OBJ.CL8 +OBJ.CL9 +OBJ.CL1%0 +OBJ.CL11 +OBJ.CL12 +OBJ.CL13 +OBJ.CL14 +OBJ.CL15 +OBJ.CL16
	
	+REFL		!!!Reflexive
	+BEN		!!!Benefactive
	+RECIP		!!!Reciprocal
	+INSTorCAUSE	!!!Instrument or cause
	+NEUT		!!!Neutral
	+REV		!!!Reversive
	+PASS		!!!Passive
	+IMP		!!!Imperfective aspect
	+PERF		!!!Perfective aspect
	
	+INF		!!!Infinitive
	+NEG		!!!Negative
	+COND		!!!Conditional
	+PRES		!!!Present
	+CONT		!!!Continuous
	+CONS		!!!Consecutive
	+IMM.PAST	!!!Immediate past
	+RMT.PAST	!!!Remote past
	+RCT.PAST	!!!Recent past
	+HAB.PAST  +HAB.PAST2	!!!Habitual past (2 components of verb required to form habitual past)
	+PRES.PROG	!!!Present progressive
	+PRES.HAB	!!!Present habitual
	+FUT		!!!Future
	+PRES.STAT.HAB	!!!Present stative habitual
	+PRES.STAT.PROG	!!!Present stative progressive
	
	+LOC		!!!Locative
	+REPEATEDLY	!!!Repeated action
	
	+YOUNG.OF	!!!Young of
	+MALE.OF	!!!Male of
	+FEMALE.OF	!!!Female of
	+LOAN		!!!Loan word
	
	+GUESS		!!!Indicates that the lemma is guessed

LEXICON Root
	+NUM+:0		Numeral;
	+PUNC+:0	Symbol;
	0:0		RootWords;
	
LEXICON RootWords
	+N:0		NounPrefix;
	+PRO:0		Pronoun;
	+ADJ:0		Adjective;
	+DEM:0		Demonstrative;
	+V:0		Verb;
	+ADV:0		AdverbHelper;
	+PREP:0		PrepositionHelper;
	+CONJ+:0	Conjunction;
	+INTERJ+:0	Interjection;

LEXICON Numeral
	%0	Numeral;
	1	Numeral;
	2	Numeral;
	3	Numeral;
	4	Numeral;
	5	Numeral;
	6	Numeral;
	7	Numeral;
	8	Numeral;
	9	Numeral;
	%.	Numeral;
	%,	Numeral;
	0:0		#;

LEXICON Symbol
	%'	Symbol;
	%.	Symbol;
	%?	Symbol;
	%!	Symbol;
	%,	Symbol;
	%@	Symbol;
	%;	Symbol;
	%&	Symbol;
	%^	Symbol;
	%/	Symbol;
	%:	Symbol;
	%(	Symbol;
	%)	Symbol;
	%"	Symbol;
	%'	Symbol;
	%;	Symbol;
	%-	Symbol;
	0:0	#;
         

LEXICON Interjection
	aleluya		#;
	ba uretse		#;
	bwacyeye		#;
	gira umugore		#;
	hobe		#;
	ijoro ryiza		#;
	Imana ikurinde		#;
	imana ishimwe		#;
	isabukuru nziza		#;
	karibu		#;
	mbabarira		#;
	mpole		#;
	mugire amahoro		#;
	muntunge		#;
	murabeho		#;
	muraho		#;
	murakaza neza		#;
	murakoze		#;
	muramuke		#;
	mwaramutse		#;
	mwirirwe		#;
	mwiriwe		#;
	ngaho		#;
	ngwino		#;
	ni byo		#;
	nta kibazo		#;
	pole		#;
	salama		#;
	sawa		#;
	si byo		#;
	umunsi mwiza		#;
	yesu akuzwe		#;
	yesu ashimwe		#;
	dore		#;
	ego ko		#;
	nyamuneka		#;
	ntacyo		#;
	karame		#;


LEXICON PrepositionHelper
	+POSS:0     PossessPrep;
	+:0		Preposition;

LEXICON Preposition
        buri        PrepContraction;
        hirya        PrepContraction;
        i        PrepContraction;
        imbere        PrepContraction;
        inyuma        PrepContraction;
        ku        PrepContraction;
        kuri        PrepContraction;
        kwa        PrepContraction;
        mbere        PrepContraction;
        mu        PrepContraction;
        muri        PrepContraction;
        na        PrepContraction;
        nka        PrepContraction;
        nyuma        PrepContraction;
        ukwa        PrepContraction;
	na:na%^		PronounNaNka;
	nka:nka%^		PronounNaNka;
	ukwa:ukwa%^		PronounAlone;
  
LEXICON PossessPrep
        +CL1:w%^     PossessHelper;
        +CL2:b%^    PossessHelper;
        +CL3:w%^     PossessHelper;
        +CL4:y%^     PossessHelper;
        +CL5:ry%^     PossessHelper;
        +CL6:y%^     PossessHelper;
        +CL7:cy%^    PossessHelper;
        +CL8:by%^     PossessHelper;
        +CL9:y%^     PossessHelper;
        +CL1%0:z%^     PossessHelper;
        +CL11:rw%^     PossessHelper;
        +CL12:k%^     PossessHelper;
        +CL13:tw%^     PossessHelper;
        +CL14:bw%^     PossessHelper;
        +CL15:kw%^     PossessHelper;
        +CL16:h%^     PossessHelper;

LEXICON PossessHelper
        +POSS:a     PrepContraction;
        0:o         PrepContraction;

LEXICON PrepContraction
        0:%&         RootWords;
        0:0         #;
	0:%&		#;

LEXICON Adjective
	+CL1:mu%^		AdjStemHelper;
	+CL2:ba%^	AdjStemHelper;
	+CL3:mu%^	AdjStemHelper;
	+CL4:mi%^	AdjStemHelper;
	+CL5:ri%^	AdjStemHelper;
	+CL6:ma%^	AdjStemHelper;
	+CL7:ki%^	AdjStemHelper;
	+CL8:bi%^	AdjStemHelper;
	+CL9:n%^		AdjStemHelper;
	+CL9+LOAN:0%^		AdjStemHelper;
	+CL9:z%^		AdjStemHelper;
	+CL9:nz%^		AdjStemHelper;
	+CL1%0:n%^		AdjStemHelper;
	+CL1%0+LOAN:0%^	AdjStemHelper;
	+CL1%0:z%^		AdjStemHelper;
	+CL1%0:nz%^		AdjStemHelper;
        +CL11:ru%^       AdjStemHelper;
        +CL12:ka%^       AdjStemHelper;
        +CL13:tu%^       AdjStemHelper;
	+CL14:bu%^	AdjStemHelper;
        +CL15:ku%^	AdjStemHelper;
	+CL16:ha%^	AdjStemHelper;
        +POSS:0%^     PossessivePrefix;

LEXICON AdjStemHelper
	+:0		AdjStem;

LEXICON PossessivePrefix
        +OWNED.CL1:wa%^    PossessiveAdj;
        +OWNED.CL2:ba%^    PossessiveAdj;
        +OWNED.CL3:wa%^    PossessiveAdj;
        +OWNED.CL4:ya%^    PossessiveAdj;
        +OWNED.CL5:rya%^   PossessiveAdj;
        +OWNED.CL6:ya%^    PossessiveAdj;
        +OWNED.CL7:cya%^   PossessiveAdj;
        +OWNED.CL8:bya%^   PossessiveAdj;
        +OWNED.CL9:ya%^    PossessiveAdj;
        +OWNED.CL1%0:za%^  PossessiveAdj;
        +OWNED.CL11:rwa%^  PossessiveAdj;
        +OWNED.CL12:ka%^   PossessiveAdj;
        +OWNED.CL13:twa%^  PossessiveAdj;
        +OWNED.CL14:bwa%^  PossessiveAdj;
        +OWNED.CL15:kwa%^  PossessiveAdj;
        +OWNED.CL16:ha%^   PossessiveAdj;

LEXICON PossessiveAdj
        +OWNER.1SG:njye     #;
        +OWNER.1PL:cu     #;
        +OWNER.2SG:we     #;
        +OWNER.2PL:nyu     #;
        +OWNER.3SG:e     #;
        +OWNER.3PL:bo     #;
        +OWNER.CL3:wo     #;
        +OWNER.CL4:yo     #;
        +OWNER.CL5:ryo     #;
        +OWNER.CL6:yo     #;
        +OWNER.CL7:cyo     #;
        +OWNER.CL8:byo     #;
        +OWNER.CL9:yo     #;
        +OWNER.CL1%0:zo     #;
        +OWNER.CL11:rwo     #;
        +OWNER.CL12:ko     #;
        +OWNER.CL13:two     #;
        +OWNER.CL14:bwo     #;
        +OWNER.CL15:kwo     #;
        +OWNER.CL16:ho     #;

LEXICON RePartTwo
	+CL1+re:mure		#;
	+CL2+re:bare	#;
	+CL3+re:mure	#;
	+CL4+re:mire	#;
	+CL5+re:rire	#;
	+CL6+re:mare	#;
	+CL7+re:kire	#;
	+CL8+re:bire	#;
	+CL9+re:nre		#;
	+CL1%0+re:nre		#;
        +CL11+re:rure     #;
        +CL12+re:kare       #;
        +CL13+re:ture       #;
	+CL14+re:bure	#;
        +CL15+re:kure	#;
	+CL16+re:hare	#;

LEXICON NounPrefix
	+OF:nya%^		Noun;
	0:0			Noun;

LEXICON AdjStem
        re        RePartTwo;
